Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1234
Permitholders; inspection of records and permits.

(1) Permitholders shall make available for inspection at all reasonable times their records kept pursuant to sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such sections. The Nebraska State Patrol may enter during business hours the premises, including places of storage, of any permitholder for the purpose of inspecting and examining (a) any records or documents required to be kept by such permitholder under sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such sections and (b) any explosive materials kept or stored by such permitholder at such premises.

(2) Holders of use permits and business enterprise purchase permits shall retain such permits and make them available to the Nebraska State Patrol on request. Storage permits shall be posted and kept available for inspection at all places of storage of explosive materials.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 266;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 12.